Hawaii, session 2025, SB1406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that section 6E-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, plays an important role in the protection and management of the State's historic properties and burial sites.  Section 6E-8(b) requires the department of Hawaiian home lands, prior to any proposed project relating to lands under its jurisdiction, to consult with the department of land and natural resources regarding the effect of the project upon historic property or a burial site.  The purpose of this Act is to allow the department of Hawaiian home lands to review the effect of any proposed project on historic properties or burial sites for lands under its jurisdiction. Section 2.  Section 6E-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) [The] Notwithstanding subsection (a), the department of Hawaiian home lands[, prior to] may review the effect of any proposed project relating to lands under its jurisdiction[, shall consult with the department regarding the effect of the project] upon historic property or a burial site[.], subject to this chapter and to any administrative rule adopted thereunder; provided that the department of Hawaiian home lands shall: (1)  Designate the review to a Hawaiian home lands preservation officer who has professional competence and experience in the field of historic preservation and who has received a written delegation of authority to review the effect of department of Hawaiian home land projects on historic property or a burial site from the state historic preservation officer; (2)  Ensure that copies of all reports, maps, and documents, including those reflecting the Hawaiian home lands preservation official's comments, recommendations, and decisions, are provided to the department to be incorporated into the historic preservation digital document management system and library; and (3)  Notify the department that the department of Hawaiian home lands will be reviewing the effect when initiating review and provide the department with a copy of the written concurrence or nonconcurrence at the end of the review. The department shall retain authority for review under this section for projects affecting properties listed or nominated for inclusion in the Hawaii register of historic places or the national register of historic places." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST